Idaho, session 2025, H0329.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-205B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-405, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-405. ASSESSMENT OF OPERATING PROPERTY. (1) The state tax commis-
sion must assess all taxable operating property at a meeting of the commis-
sion convening on the second Monday of August in each year, and must complete
the assessment of such property on the fourth Monday in August.
(2) The state tax commission shall determine the system value and cal-
culate the allocation and apportionment of the system value for all taxable
operating property and specifically determine:
(a) The number of miles and the value per mile of each railroad in the
state and for each taxing district in which such railroad may exist.


(b) The number of miles and the value per mile of each telephone corpo-
ration in the state and for each taxing district in which such telephone
corporation may exist.
(c) The number of miles and the value per mile of each pipeline in the
state and for each taxing district in which such pipeline may exist.
(d) The number of miles and the value per mile of each water company
under the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission in the state,
and for each taxing district in which such water company may exist. The
value per mile of any line included in this subsection, except rail-
roads, shall be determined by dividing the total value of such line
within the state by the number of miles of such line within the state.
The value per mile of railroad line shall be determined by apportionment
of the total value of line within the state. The apportionment shall
be based twenty percent (20%) on the ratio of line miles in the state to
line miles in the county; forty percent (40%) on the ratio of net ton
miles in the state to net ton miles in the county; and forty percent
(40%) on the ratio of station revenues in the state to station revenues
in the county. All operating property of railroads shall be apportioned
to the counties as part of the railroad line in the county. The appor-
tionment for taxing districts shall be the same as the apportionment
among counties.
(e) The system value, the number of miles and the value per mile of each
electric current transmission line and each electric current distribu-
tion line in each county separately, and for each taxing district within
said county in which such transmission and distribution lines may ex-
ist. The value per mile of any line included in this subsection shall
be determined by dividing the apportioned value of such line within each
county by the number of miles of such line within said county.
(f) (e) The system value of private railcar fleets entering or standing
in Idaho in the year preceding the constituted lien as provided in sec-
tion 63-411(3), Idaho Code.
(g) (f) The system value and calculate the allocation and apportionment
of the system value for all other taxable operating property.
(3) On and after January 1, 2004, any newly installed or constructed
equipment located within a city corporate limit or within five (5) miles
of a city corporate limit and used for and in conjunction with the thermal
generation of electricity shall be apportioned based on physical location.
For purposes of this subsection newly installed or constructed equipment
used for and in conjunction with the thermal generation of electricity shall
not include the remodeling, retrofitting, rehabilitation, refurbishing or
modification of an existing electrical generation facility, or integration
or transformation facilities such as substations or transmission lines.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 63-301A, Idaho Code, property
apportioned based on physical location pursuant to this subsection shall be
placed on the new construction roll. For rate-regulated electric utility
companies, rate-regulated affiliated gas companies, and rate-regulated gas
companies subject to taxation as provided in section 63-3502B(3) or (4),
Idaho Code, the state tax commission shall determine the amount of such tax
to be apportioned to each county separately in proportion to the property
tax levied by all eligible taxing districts and units and amounts allocated


to each urban renewal agency statewide in tax year 2025 on the operating
property of rate-regulated electric utility companies, rate-regulated af-
filiated gas companies, and rate-regulated gas companies. The 2025 property
tax amounts levied or allocated shall be certified by each county auditor
to the state tax commission no later than January 12, 2026. The state tax
commission shall calculate proportions by dividing the total amount so re-
ported for each county by the sum of all such amounts for all eligible taxing
districts and units and urban renewal agencies statewide. Taxing dis-
tricts, units, and urban renewal agencies are eligible for a proportion of
this tax and are included in the calculation of these proportions, provided
they levied property tax against the operating property of rate-regulated
electric utility companies, rate-regulated affiliated gas companies, and
rate-regulated gas companies or received an allocation of property tax paid
by such companies for tax year 2025. In the event that a taxing district
or unit or urban renewal revenue allocation area dissolves or is no longer
present in a county, or a voter approved bond expires, the proportions for
each taxing district in each affected county shall be changed as follows:
(a) The state tax commission shall reapportion the kilowatt-hour and
thermal energy tax revenue that would have accrued to the dissolving
district or revenue allocation area or expiring voter approved bond.
The reapportioned tax shall be distributed to each otherwise eligible
taxing district and revenue allocation area in the county with bound-
aries that overlapped the dissolved district or revenue allocation area
or expired voter approved bond. The proportionate share for each taxing
district and revenue allocation area shall be determined by dividing
the current distribution to that district and revenue allocation area
by the total distribution to all districts and revenue allocation areas
that overlap the dissolving district or revenue allocation area.
(b) Such reapportionment shall be made in the year immediately follow-
ing the year of the dissolution and the county auditor shall be notified
of the changed proportions no later than the first Monday in March of
that year.
(c) The proportions used to determine the amount of kilowatt-hour tax
and thermal energy tax to be billed to rate-regulated electric utility
companies, rate-regulated affiliated gas companies, and rate-reg-
ulated gas companies and payable to each county pursuant to section
63-3503C(2), Idaho Code, shall not change.
(4) At least once every five (5) years, the state tax commission shall
examine and verify the investment of each rate-regulated electric utility
company, rate-regulated affiliated gas company, and rate-regulated gas com-
pany in each county and shall submit a report to the legislature that details
each county's investment in relation to the total statewide investment.
(4) (5) If the value of property of any company assessable under this
section is of such a nature that it cannot reasonably be apportioned on the
basis of rail, wire, and pipeline mileage, such as microwave and radio relay
stations, the tax commission may adopt such other method or basis of appor-
tionment to the county and taxing districts in which the property is situate
as may be feasible and proper.
(6) Any departure from market value in an assessment of operating prop-
erty made to ensure compliance with federal law or precedent shall be consid-


ered an exemption. The state tax commission shall identify such departures
from market value in their appraisals and no application need be made by a
taxpayer to receive such exemption.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-602O, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-602JJ, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-602JJ. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM TAXATION -- CERTAIN PROPERTY OF PRO-
DUCER OF ELECTRICITY BY MEANS OF WIND, SOLAR, OR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY -- RATE-
REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY COMPANIES, RATE-REGULATED AFFILIATED GAS COMPA-
NIES, AND RATE-REGULATED GAS COMPANIES. Real estate, fixtures, or personal
property is exempt from taxation if it is:
(1) Owned, controlled, operated, or managed by an electrical or natural
gas association or; a rate-regulated electric utility company; a producer of
electricity by means of wind energy, solar energy, or geothermal energy, ex-
cluding entities that are regulated by the Idaho public utilities commission
as to price; a rate-regulated affiliated gas company; or a rate-regulated
gas company;
(2) Held or used in connection with or to facilitate the generation,
transmission, distribution, delivery, or measuring of electric power, natu-
ral gas, or electrical electric energy generated, manufactured or produced
by means of wind energy, solar energy or geothermal energy, and all conduits,
ducts or other devices, materials, apparatus, or property for containing,
holding, or carrying conductors used for the transmission, distribution,
and delivery of electric power, natural gas, or electric energy generated,
manufactured or produced by means of wind energy, solar energy or geothermal
energy, including construction tools, materials, and supplies; and
(3) Subject to the taxes on gross earnings of wind, solar, or geothermal
energy earnings, the kilowatt hour taxes on rate-regulated electric utility
companies, or the taxes on therms of natural gas for rate-regulated affili-
ated gas companies and rate-regulated gas companies pursuant to chapter 35,
title 63, Idaho Code, but not subject to assessment by a county assessor pur-
suant to section 63-402, Idaho Code.
(4) For purposes of this section and chapter 35, title 63, Idaho Code:
(a) "Rate-regulated affiliated gas company" means a public utility as
defined in section 61-129, Idaho Code, that is engaged in the transmis-
sion, distribution, or delivery of natural gas in this state and that is
part of a combined utility company that also owns and operates a rate-
regulated electric utility company subject to tax pursuant to chapter
35, title 63, Idaho Code.
(b) "Rate-regulated gas company" means a public utility as defined in
section 61-129, Idaho Code, that is engaged in the transmission, dis-
tribution, or delivery of natural gas in this state and is not part of a
combined utility company and does not own or operate any other utility
company subject to tax pursuant to chapter 35, title 63, Idaho Code.
(c) "Therm" means a measure of the heat content of natural gas equal to
one hundred thousand (100,000) British thermal units.


SECTION 5. That Section 63-603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 63-3502B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3502B. LEVY OF TAX ON WIND ENERGY PRODUCTION, SOLAR ENERGY
OR PRODUCTION, GEOTHERMAL ENERGY ELECTRICAL PRODUCTION, RATE-REGULATED
ELECTRIC UTILITY COMPANIES, RATE-REGULATED AFFILIATED GAS COMPANIES, AND
RATE-REGULATED GAS COMPANIES. (1) A wind energy tax or a geothermal energy
tax shall be levied against every producer of electricity by means of wind
energy or geothermal energy in the amount of three percent (3%) of such pro-
ducer's gross wind energy earnings or geothermal energy earnings.
(2) A solar energy tax shall be levied against every producer of elec-
tricity by means of solar energy in the amount of three and one-half percent
(3.5%) of the producer's gross solar energy earnings.
(3) A kilowatt-hour tax shall be levied against every rate-regulated
electric utility company operating in Idaho on all such electricity and
electrical energy sold to retail customers in Idaho, as reported by such
company to the Idaho public utilities commission; however, if such a report
contains kilowatt-hour sales data for another state, the kilowatt-hour tax
established under this section shall not be applied to those out-of-state
sales. The kilowatt-hour tax shall be nine hundred twenty-three millionths
of a dollar ($0.000923) per kilowatt-hour sold.
(4)(a) A thermal energy tax shall be levied against every rate-regu-
lated affiliated gas company on all natural gas sold to retail customers
in Idaho at a rate of ten thousand eight hundred two millionths of a dol-
lar ($0.010802) per therm of natural gas sold.
(b) A thermal energy tax shall be levied against every rate-regulated
gas company on all natural gas sold to retail customers in Idaho at
a rate of three hundred twenty-nine hundred-thousandths of a dollar
($0.00329) per therm of natural gas sold. A separate thermal energy tax
shall be levied against every rate-regulated gas company on all nat-
ural gas delivered to a transport gas customer at a rate of forty-one
hundred-thousandths of a dollar ($0.00041) per therm of natural gas
delivered to a transport gas customer by a rate-regulated gas company.
For the purposes of this subsection, "transport gas customer" means an
entity that purchases gas from a supplier other than a rate-regulated
gas company but that contracts with a rate-regulated gas company to de-
liver gas to its meter.
(3) (5) This The wind energy tax, solar energy tax, or geothermal
energy tax, kilowatt-hour tax, and thermal energy tax provided in this sec-
tion shall be in lieu of all other taxes on the property of such wind energy
producer, of such solar energy producer, or of such geothermal energy pro-
ducer, rate-regulated electric utility company, rate-regulated affiliated
gas company, or rate-regulated gas company exempted pursuant to section
63-602JJ, Idaho Code.
(4) (6) For purposes of the certification required by section 63-803,
Idaho Code, and the limitations provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code,
the taxes levied pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall reduce
the property tax to be levied to finance an annual budget, and shall not be


included in the amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget
for purposes of limitations on increases in the annual budget as provided in
section 63-802, Idaho Code. Kilowatt-hour taxes and thermal energy taxes
apportioned to each taxing district pursuant to section 63-3503C, Idaho
Code, shall be treated as property tax revenue for the purposes of the limi-
tations provided in section 63-802, Idaho Code.
(7) By January 1, 2027, rate-regulated electric utility companies,
rate-regulated affiliated gas companies, and rate-regulated gas companies
shall include the kilowatt-hour and thermal energy tax on the billings to
its Idaho customers. The public utilities commission shall adjust the base
tariff rates for customers to the extent those rates included a recovery of
property taxes on operating property or the kilowatt-hour taxes or thermal
energy taxes assessed pursuant to this section.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 35, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3502C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3502C. EXEMPTION OF KILOWATT-HOUR TAX FOR ELECTRICITY USED IN IR-
RIGATION.
(1)(a) The kilowatt-hour tax payable by rate-regulated electric util-
ity companies shall be reduced and shall be exempt from taxation to the
extent of kilowatt-hours used for furnishing power for pumping water
for irrigation or drainage purposes on lands in the state of Idaho.
The reduction shall be in the amount of nine hundred twenty-three mil-
lionths of a dollar ($0.000923) per kilowatt-hour billed to each user
of power using pumping water for irrigation or drainage purposes. The
utility shall determine the credit to which each consumer is entitled
by virtue of this exemption and shall refund that amount or credit the
amount against the consumer's bills.
(b) The exemption provided for in this section shall accrue to the ben-
efit of the consumer of such power, except in cases where the water so
pumped is sold or rented to irrigate lands, in which event the kilowatt-
hour taxes associated with generating or delivering power shall be sub-
ject to taxation to the extent that such water is sold or rented.
(c) If the consumer is not a customer of the deliverer of electrical
power, the kilowatt-hour taxes that would have been due from such util-
ity related to the exemption, if such exemption had not been applied,
shall be paid annually for each year in which the exemption is applied
directly to the consumer by the utility delivering such electricity for
irrigation purposes. To qualify for credit or direct payment, the per-
son or organization at the point of delivery must also be the person or
organization pumping water for irrigation purposes and not a distribu-
tor or redistributor of electrical power. To receive the benefit of the
exemption under this section, each consumer who is not a customer of the
deliverer of electrical power must file an application with the state
tax commission on or before April 30 each year. The state tax commis-
sion shall prescribe by rule the form and information necessary for such
application. The procedures described in this section shall be used in
determining the benefit to which each consumer is entitled by virtue of
this exemption.


(2) The rate-regulated electric utility shall include in its statement
filed pursuant to section 63-3503C, Idaho Code, a schedule showing the kilo-
watt-hours relied on by the utility to provide the exemption provided in this
section and a certification that the credits or refunds related to the ex-
emption have been paid or credited. The public utilities commission shall
have jurisdiction under the public utilities law to ensure utility compli-
ance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 8. That Chapter 35, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3503C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3503C. CALCULATION, COLLECTION, ALLOTMENT, AND APPORTIONMENT
OF TAX FROM RATE-REGULATED ELECTRIC UTILITY COMPANIES, RATE-REGULATED
AFFILIATED GAS COMPANIES, AND RATE-REGULATED GAS COMPANIES BY STATE TAX
COMMISSION. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, and on or before April 15 of
each year thereafter, every rate-regulated electric utility, rate-regu-
lated affiliated gas company, and rate-regulated gas company in this state
shall file with the state tax commission a statement of the amount of its
kilowatt-hours and therms sold in Idaho for the preceding calendar year,
and for rate-regulated electric utilities, the amount of kilowatt-hours
sold the preceding year for furnishing power for pumping water for irri-
gation or drainage purposes, as provided by section 63-3502C, Idaho Code.
The rate-regulated electric utilities, rate-regulated affiliated gas com-
pany, and rate-regulated gas companies shall also provide such information
as shall be necessary for the state tax commission to redetermine the al-
locations of the tax as required in section 63-405(4), Idaho Code. Upon
examining and verifying such statement, the state tax commission shall com-
pute the amount of the tax due using the rates found in section 63-3502B(3)
and (4), Idaho Code, and reduced as provided in section 63-3502C, Idaho Code,
for rate-regulated electric utilities eligible for such exemption.
(2) Upon the calculation of taxes determined in this section, and no
later than the third Monday of May, the state tax commission shall notify
each county treasurer of the amount of taxes due to the county based on the
proportions calculated pursuant to section 63-405(3) and (4), Idaho Code.
Such tax shall be billed by the state tax commission to each rate-regu-
lated electric utility company, rate-regulated affiliated gas company, and
rate-regulated gas company no later than the fourth Monday of May and due and
payable to the state tax commission no later than June 30. Upon receipt of
such tax payments, the state tax commission shall promptly pay to each county
treasurer the proportionate share of such taxes due to the county as provided
in this section.
(3) By no later than the fourth Monday of July each year, each county
auditor shall notify each taxing district, unit, and urban renewal agency of
the amount they will receive. By the fourth Monday of August, such amounts
will be paid by the county auditor to each eligible taxing district, unit,
and urban renewal agency.
(4) A new taxing district or revenue allocation area formed after Jan-
uary 1, 2025, shall not be eligible for a tax distribution pursuant to this
section.


(5) If any taxing districts consolidate, the resulting district is en-
titled to a tax distribution pursuant to this section equal to the sum of the
tax distributions that would have been made to each district prior to consol-
idation.
(6) Any taxes levied pursuant to this section and not paid by June 30
shall become delinquent and a penalty of five percent (5%) thereof shall be
imposed, together with interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month
from June 30 until paid.
(7) All taxes due and payable under this section shall be a lien on
all property, real and personal, of the rate-regulated electric utility
company, rate-regulated affiliated gas company, or rate-regulated gas com-
pany as of June 30 of each year and shall be discharged only by the payment
thereof. In any action to enforce payment of any delinquent taxes due under
this section, the county pursuing such action shall be entitled to a judg-
ment for the reasonable costs of prosecuting such action, as well as for the
delinquent taxes, penalty, and interest.
(8) If a rate-regulated electric utility, rate-regulated affiliated
gas company, or rate-regulated gas company fails to file the statement of
kilowatt-hours or therms sold in Idaho required pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section, the state tax commission shall use the best available infor-
mation to determine the kilowatt-hours or therms sold in Idaho.
SECTION 9. That Section 63-3506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3506. ASSESSMENT OF PROPERTY BY ASSESSOR. Any property not subject
to the gross receipts tax levied in this chapter of any cooperative elec-
trical or natural gas association, or producer of electricity by means of
wind energy, by means of solar energy, or by means of geothermal energy, any
property not subject to the kilowatt-hour tax levied in this chapter on any
rate-regulated electric utility company, and any property not subject to the
thermal energy tax levied in this chapter on any rate-regulated affiliated
gas company or rate-regulated gas company shall be assessed by the county
assessor of the county wherein such property is situate, and taxes levied
against the same shall be a lien, and shall be due and payable, in the same
manner as are any other taxes on property.
SECTION 10. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.